Illinois, session 104th, HB3680.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The sum of $18,000,000, or so much thereof as 5may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 6Fund to the Illinois Emergency Management Agency and Office of 7Homeland Security for deposit into the IEMA State Projects 8Fund for grants and operational expenses associated with the 9administration of Illinois' Not-For-Profit Security Grant 10Program, pursuant to subsection (g-5) of Section 5 of the 11Illinois Emergency Management Agency Act. 12    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 132025.